Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1825
Organ and tissue
donations; legislative findings.

The Legislature
finds and declares that it is in the public interest to facilitate organ and
tissue donations pursuant to the Revised Uniform
Anatomical Gift Act and thereby to increase the availability of organs and
tissues for medical transplantation. To accomplish these purposes, the following
constitutes the procedure to facilitate the recovery of organs and tissues
from donors under the jurisdiction of a coroner within a time period compatible
with the preservation of such organ or tissue for the purpose of transplantation.

Laws 2008, LB246, § 1;

Laws 2010, LB1036, § 23.

Revised Uniform Anatomical Gift Act, see section 71-4824.